browser/locales/l10n/fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX yD Y 41
SFX yD dire dire/n'q'd'l'm't's' dire po:infi
SFX yD dire disant/n'q'd'l'm't's' dire po:ppre
SFX yD dire dit/L'D'Q' dire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX yD dire dits/D'Q' dire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX yD dire dite/L'D'Q' dire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX yD dire dites/D'Q' dire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX yD dire dis/j'n'q'l'm't' dire po:ipre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yD dire dit/n'q'l'm't's' dire po:ipre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX yD dire disons/n'q'l't' dire po:ipre po:1pl
SFX yD dire disez/n'q'l'm' dire po:ipre po:2pl
SFX yD dire disent/n'q'l'm't's' dire po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX yD dire disais/j'n'q'l'm't' dire po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yD dire disait/n'q'l'm't's' dire po:iimp po:3sg
SFX yD dire disions/n'q'l't' dire po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX yD dire disiez/n'q'l'm' dire po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX yD dire disaient/n'q'l'm't's' dire po:iimp po:3pl
SFX yD dire dîmes/n'q'l't' dire po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX yD dire dîtes/n'q'l'm' dire po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX yD dire dirent/n'q'l'm't's' dire po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX yD dire dirai/j'n'q'l'm't' dire po:ifut po:1sg
SFX yD dire diras/n'q'l'm't' dire po:ifut po:2sg
SFX yD dire dira/n'q'l'm't's' dire po:ifut po:3sg
SFX yD dire dirons/n'q'l't' dire po:ifut po:1pl
SFX yD dire direz/n'q'l'm' dire po:ifut po:2pl
SFX yD dire diront/n'q'l'm't's' dire po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX yD dire dirais/j'n'q'l'm't' dire po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yD dire dirait/n'q'l'm't's' dire po:cond po:3sg
SFX yD dire dirions/n'q'l't' dire po:cond po:1pl
SFX yD dire diriez/n'q'l'm' dire po:cond po:2pl
SFX yD dire diraient/n'q'l'm't's' dire po:cond po:3pl
SFX yD dire dise/j'n'q'l'm't's' dire po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX yD dire dises/n'q'l'm't' dire po:spre po:2sg
SFX yD dire disse/j'n'q'l'm't' dire po:simp po:1sg
SFX yD dire disses/n'q'l'm't' dire po:simp po:2sg
SFX yD dire dît/n'q'l'm't's' dire po:simp po:3sg
SFX yD dire dissions/n'q'l't' dire po:simp po:1pl
SFX yD dire dissiez/n'q'l'm' dire po:simp po:2pl
SFX yD dire dissent/n'q'l'm't's' dire po:simp po:3pl
SFX yD dire dis/n'l'm't' dire po:impe po:2sg
SFX yD dire disons/n'l't' dire po:impe po:1pl
SFX yD dire disez/n'l'm' dire po:impe po:2pl

SFX yE Y 38
SFX yE édire édire/n'q'd'l'm't's' édire po:infi
SFX yE édire édisant/n'q'd'l'm't's' édire po:ppre
SFX yE édire édit/q' édire po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX yE édire édis/j'n'q'l'm't' édire po:ipre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yE édire édit/n'q'l'm't's' édire po:ipre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX yE édire édisons/n'q'l't' édire po:ipre po:1pl
SFX yE édire édisez/n'q'l'm' édire po:ipre po:2pl
SFX yE édire édisent/n'q'l'm't's' édire po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX yE édire édisais/j'n'q'l'm't' édire po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yE édire édisait/n'q'l'm't's' édire po:iimp po:3sg
SFX yE édire édisions/n'q'l't' édire po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX yE édire édisiez/n'q'l'm' édire po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX yE édire édisaient/n'q'l'm't's' édire po:iimp po:3pl
SFX yE édire édîmes/n'q'l't' édire po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX yE édire édîtes/n'q'l'm' édire po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX yE édire édirent/n'q'l'm't's' édire po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX yE édire édirai/j'n'q'l'm't' édire po:ifut po:1sg
SFX yE édire édiras/n'q'l'm't' édire po:ifut po:2sg
SFX yE édire édira/n'q'l'm't's' édire po:ifut po:3sg
SFX yE édire édirons/n'q'l't' édire po:ifut po:1pl
SFX yE édire édirez/n'q'l'm' édire po:ifut po:2pl
SFX yE édire édiront/n'q'l'm't's' édire po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX yE édire édirais/j'n'q'l'm't' édire po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yE édire édirait/n'q'l'm't's' édire po:cond po:3sg
SFX yE édire édirions/n'q'l't' édire po:cond po:1pl
SFX yE édire édiriez/n'q'l'm' édire po:cond po:2pl
SFX yE édire édiraient/n'q'l'm't's' édire po:cond po:3pl
SFX yE édire édise/j'n'q'l'm't's' édire po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX yE édire édises/n'q'l'm't' édire po:spre po:2sg
SFX yE édire édisse/j'n'q'l'm't' édire po:simp po:1sg
SFX yE édire édisses/n'q'l'm't' édire po:simp po:2sg
SFX yE édire édît/n'q'l'm't's' édire po:simp po:3sg
SFX yE édire édissions/n'q'l't' édire po:simp po:1pl
SFX yE édire édissiez/n'q'l'm' édire po:simp po:2pl
SFX yE édire édissent/n'q'l'm't's' édire po:simp po:3pl
SFX yE édire édis/n'l'm't' édire po:impe po:2sg
SFX yE édire édisons/n'l't' édire po:impe po:1pl
SFX yE édire édisez/n'l'm' édire po:impe po:2pl

SFX yF Y 37
SFX yF audire audire/n'q'd'l'm't's' udire po:infi
SFX yF audire audissant/n'q'd'l'm't's' udire po:ppre
SFX yF audire audit/L'D'Q' udire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX yF audire audits/D'Q' udire po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX yF audire audite/L'D'Q' udire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX yF audire audites/D'Q' udire po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX yF audire audis/j'n'q'l'm't' udire po:ipre po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yF audire audit/n'q'l'm't's' udire po:ipre po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX yF audire audissons/n'q'l't' udire po:ipre po:1pl
SFX yF audire audissez/n'q'l'm' udire po:ipre po:2pl
SFX yF audire audissent/n'q'l'm't's' udire po:ipre po:spre po:simp po:3pl
SFX yF audire audissais/j'n'q'l'm't' udire po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yF audire audissait/n'q'l'm't's' udire po:iimp po:3sg
SFX yF audire audissions/n'q'l't' udire po:iimp po:spre po:simp po:1pl
SFX yF audire audissiez/n'q'l'm' udire po:iimp po:spre po:simp po:2pl
SFX yF audire audissaient/n'q'l'm't's' udire po:iimp po:3pl
SFX yF audire audîmes/n'q'l't' udire po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX yF audire audîtes/n'q'l'm' udire po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX yF audire audirent/n'q'l'm't's' udire po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX yF audire audirai/j'n'q'l'm't' udire po:ifut po:1sg
SFX yF audire audiras/n'q'l'm't' udire po:ifut po:2sg
SFX yF audire audira/n'q'l'm't's' udire po:ifut po:3sg
SFX yF audire audirons/n'q'l't' udire po:ifut po:1pl
SFX yF audire audirez/n'q'l'm' udire po:ifut po:2pl
SFX yF audire audiront/n'q'l'm't's' udire po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX yF audire audirais/j'n'q'l'm't' udire po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX yF audire audirait/n'q'l'm't's' udire po:cond po:3sg
SFX yF audire audirions/n'q'l't' udire po:cond po:1pl
SFX yF audire audiriez/n'q'l'm' udire po:cond po:2pl
SFX yF audire audiraient/n'q'l'm't's' udire po:cond po:3pl
SFX yF audire audisse/j'n'q'l'm't' udire po:spre po:simp po:1sg
SFX yF audire audisses/n'q'l'm't' udire po:spre po:simp po:2sg
SFX yF audire audisse/n'q'l'm't's' udire po:spre po:3sg
SFX yF audire audît/n'q'l'm't's' udire po:simp po:3sg
SFX yF audire audis/n'l'm't' udire po:impe po:2sg
SFX yF audire audissons/n'l't' udire po:impe po:1pl
SFX yF audire audissez/n'l'm' udire po:impe po:2pl
